Utah statutes.
53B-14-104.   Hearing set after receipt of written notice -- Notice of
hearing.
If a written response to the notice sent under Section 53B-14-102 is received
by the college, university, or board, a hearing is set within 30 days of the
receipt of the response, and written notice of the hearing is mailed to the
borrower at least 15 days before the date for the hearing.
